Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4687.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 8.37, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Money deposited in the account. deleted text begin 50deleted text end new text begin Fiftynew text end percent of all money recovered by the attorney general in a consumer enforcement action that is payable to the state and not designated as consumer enforcement public compensation or for another specific purpose deleted text begin up to the first $5,000,000 each fiscal yeardeleted text end must be deposited into the account. The remaining 50 percent of money recovered by the attorney general in a consumer enforcement action that is payable to the state and not designated as consumer enforcement public compensation or for another specific purpose must be deposited into the general fund. For purposes of this subdivision, the amount of money recovered in a consumer enforcement action that must be deposited into the fund is determined at the time when the money otherwise would have been deposited into the general fund. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 8.37, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Distributions to eligible consumers. (a) Money in the account may be distributed to any eligible consumer with an identified amount of unpaid consumer enforcement public compensation. deleted text begin If the amount of money in the account is insufficient to pay all distributions to eligible consumers with an identified amount of unpaid consumer enforcement public compensation, thedeleted text end Money must be distributed first to consumers eligible for unpaid consumer enforcement public compensation based on a consumer enforcement action with a final order of the oldest date. deleted text begin (b) If the attorney general projects that there will be insufficient funding to pay all eligible consumers from the funds available on an ongoing basis, the attorney general may recommend to the legislature that the legislature prescribe a formula for prorating or capping payments to eligible consumers so that more eligible consumers will receive payment from the fund. deleted text end new text begin (b) If money is distributed to an eligible consumer, the distribution is limited to: new text end new text begin (1) the full identified amount of unpaid consumer enforcement public compensation, up to $50,000; and new text end new text begin (2) 50 percent of the identified amount of unpaid consumer enforcement public compensation over $50,000, or $50,000, whichever is less. new text end